Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 49
SURVEYS

Section

34-49-101. Survey - notice - affidavit.

In all actions pending in any district court of this state, wherein the title or right to possession of any mining claims shall be in dispute, the court may, upon application of any of the parties to such action, enter an order for an underground as well as surface survey of such part of the property in dispute as may be necessary to a just determination of the question involved. Such order shall designate some competent surveyor not related to any of the parties to such action, or in any way interested in the result of the same, and, upon the application of the party adverse to such application, the court may also appoint some competent surveyor, to be selected by such adverse applicant, whose duty it is to attend upon such survey and observe the method of making the same, said second surveyor to be at the cost of the party asking therefor.

It is also lawful in such order to specify the names of witnesses named by either party, not exceeding three on each side, to examine such property, who shall thereupon be allowed to enter into such property and examine the same. The court may also cause the removal of any rock, debris, or other obstacle in any of the drifts or shafts of said property, when such removal is shown to be necessary to a just determination of the question involved. No such order shall be made for survey and inspection except in open court or in chambers, upon notice of application for such order for at least six days, and not then except by agreement of the parties, or upon the affidavit of two or more persons, that such survey and inspection are necessary to the just determination of the action, which affidavits shall state the facts in such case, and wherein the necessity for survey exists, nor shall such order be made unless it appears that the party asking therefor had been refused the privilege of survey and inspection by the adverse party.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 190, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1827.

G.S.

§ 2413.

R.S. 08:

§ 4218.

C.L.

§ 3300.

CSA:

C. 110, § 193.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-1.

34-49-102. Platting fractional claims.

The owners of adjoining, abutting, or adjacent fractions of patented mining properties may plat the same for taxation and description.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 376, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3301.

CSA:

C. 110, § 194.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-2.

34-49-103. Plat - monuments.

Such owners shall cause the same to be surveyed and a plat thereof to be made by the county surveyor or some other competent surveyor, which plat shall particularly describe each fraction as blocks and lots, describing by appropriate lines each fraction or parcel of land so platted. Reference shall also be made upon the plat to some known and permanent monument from which surveys may be made. If no such monument exists within convenient distance, the surveyor shall, at the time of making his survey, plant and fix at least three feet below the surface, at a corner most convenient for reference, a good and sufficient stone, the total expense of which shall not exceed the sum of fifteen dollars, and the surveyor shall designate upon the plat the point where the same may be found.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 376, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3302.

CSA:

C. 110, § 195.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-3.

34-49-104. Plat certified and recorded.

The plat, having been completed, shall be certified by the surveyor and acknowledged by him before a notary public or other officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds. The certificate of the surveyor and of acknowledgments, together with the plat, shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder in and for the county in which the land is situated, in the same manner as a deed of real estate is recorded. The acknowledgment and recording shall have like legal effect, and certified copies thereof and of such plat may be used in evidence to the same extent and with like effect, as in case of deeds.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 377, § 3.

C.L.

§ 3303.

CSA:

C. 110, § 196.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-4.

34-49-105. Not dedication of ways - fees.

The acknowledgment and recording of such plat shall not be held in law or in equity to be a conveyance in fee simple of any ways, driveways, or passageways noted on such plat, and no such plat or acknowledgment shall be admitted to record or have any effect in law or in equity until the fees of the surveyor and the charges in sections 34-49-103 and 34-49-106 shall be paid.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 377, § 4.

C.L.

§ 3304.

CSA:

C. 110, § 197.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-5.

34-49-106. County to provide books.

It is the duty of the county clerk and recorder of each county where such adjoining, abutting, or adjacent fractions of patented mining properties are situated, to provide an appropriate book for the making and preservation of the plats, surveys, certificates, and acknowledgments contemplated, and he shall be permitted to charge and collect from the owners of each such subdivision recording fees the same as for any one plat or subdivision.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 377, § 5.

C.L.

§ 3305.

CSA:

C. 110, § 198.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-6.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1227, § 10, effective April 12.

34-49-107. Designation by name and number.

It is the duty of the county clerk and recorder to designate by name or number such plat and each separate fraction of land included therein, and such fractions shall thereafter be known and described for taxation and all other purposes as so designated.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 377, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3306.

CSA:

C. 110, § 199.

CRS 53:

§ 92-25-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-25-7.